Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 478.260 is amended to read:
478.260. (1) The district board shall select a fire chief [ qualified by actual  experience as a fire-
fighter and person who is trained  in fire prevention, or otherwise, ] and assistants[ , volunteer or oth-
erwise,] and fix their compensation. The fire chief shall be responsible for the equipment  and
properties of the district. Under the direction of the board, the fire chief  shall be responsible for the
conduct of the fire department.
(2) The board, with advice and counsel of the fire chief, shall select the location of the [ fire
house or houses or headquarters ] facilities  of the fire department of the district. Such sites shall
be chosen with a view to the best service to the  residents and properties of the whole district and
may be acquired by purchase or exercise of the powers of eminent domain  in the manner provided
by ORS chapter 35. The board may purchase apparatus and  equipment as needed by the district, and
provide a water system, ponds or reservoirs for the  storage of water for fire-fighting purposes. Or
the board may contract with water companies or districts, or both, for water service  and facilities
at a rate of compensation  mutually agreed upon. The board also may divide the district into zones
or subdivisions and provide an adequate system or code of fire alarms or  signals by telephone, bell,
whistle, siren or other means of communication.
(3) A district may:
(a) Acquire real property or an easement, by purchase or other  voluntary agreement, for the
purpose of establishing a fire evacuation route.
(b) Construct or maintain a fire evacuation route on property:
(A) Owned by the district or  over which the district has an easement for the purpose of a fire
evacuation route; or
(B) Owned  by a person or governmental entity or over which a person or governmental entity
has an easement for the purpose of a fire evacuation route, with authorization from  the person or
governmental entity.
(c) Participate  in an agreement related to the construction, maintenance or use of a fire evac-
uation route.
(4) A district may operate or acquire and operate, or contract for the operation of, emergency
medical service equipment and vehicles  both within and without the boundaries of the district. A
Enrolled Senate Bill 862 (SB 862-A) Page 1
district may conduct ambulance operations only in conformance with a county plan  adopted under
ORS 682.062 for ambulance services and ambulance service  areas and with rules of the Oregon
Health Authority relating to such services and service  areas. Service authorized under a county
plan includes  authorization for a district to provide ambulance services by intergovernmental
agreement with  any other unit of local government designated by the plan to provide ambulance
services.
(5) As used  in this section, “ambulance services” has the meaning given that term in ORS
682.027.
SECTION 2.  ORS 478.270 is amended to read:
478.270. (1) The district  board shall report [ monthly] to the State Fire Marshal, upon forms
prescribed by the State Fire Marshal,  information the State Fire Marshal may require, and shall,
at any time, upon request furnish further report or information required by the  State Fire Marshal.
(2) The State Fire Marshal shall cooperate in the formation,  operation and administration of
districts. The Department of the State Fire Marshal shall prepare and make available uniform  forms
for reports required by this section and other uniform forms and blanks the State  Fire Marshal
considers advisable.
SECTION 3. ORS 478.940 is repealed.
SECTION 4. (1) The Department of the State Fire Marshal shall:
(a) Adopt a base fire prevention code, identified as the Oregon Fire Code;
(b) Keep the base fire prevention code on file at the state headquarters; and
(c) Make a copy of the base fire prevention code publicly available electronically.
(2) If a fire district adopts  a fire prevention code that contains provisions in addition to
the provisions in the base fire prevention code adopted  by the department, the fire district
shall:
(a) Keep a copy of the fire district’s fire prevention code, and  additional provisions, on
file at the fire district administrative office; and
(b) Make copies of the fire district’s fire prevention  code, and additional provisions,
publicly available electronically.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 478.970 is amended to read:
478.970. The purpose of ORS 478.970 to 478.982 is to establish [ an identification name ] a unique
identifier for each district to be used for statistical purposes by the State Fire Marshal and in  the
process of insurance rating. ORS 478.970 to 478.982 do not alter or add to  the corporate title or
identification of a district organized or established by law.
SECTION 6.  ORS 478.972 is amended to read:
478.972. (1) When a district is organized , the first board  or  chief of the district  shall [ notify]
request, in writing or via  electronic communication, that  the State Fire Marshal [ in writing of
the identification name for the district ] issue a unique identifier to the district .
(2) Except as  provided in this subsection, upon receipt of a [ written notice ] request  from the
board or chief, as described in subsection (1) of this section , the State Fire  Marshal shall im-
mediately assign the district [ the identification name. The fire marshal shall notify the board in writ-
ing if the name conflicts with the name of another fire district in this state ] a unique identifier.
(3) The district board  or chief  shall [ notify the fire marshal as provided ] submit a request de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section within 30 days after the act that  completes the organization
or establishment of the district.
SECTION 7.  ORS 478.980 is amended to read:
478.980. In the event of a  consolidation or merger of two or more districts, [ the consolidated
board shall select a name for the surviving or successor district in the manner provided in  ORS
478.972] the State Fire Marshal shall  determine a unique identifier for the consolidated or
merged districts.
SECTION 8.  ORS 478.982 is amended to read:
478.982. In the event of a dissolution of a district, the [ name] unique identifier assigned to  the
district [ is available for assignment ] may not be assigned  to another district.
Enrolled Senate Bill 862 (SB 862-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate March 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 862 (SB 862-A) Page 3